languages/apertium-kaa/dev/kaa.Latn_1991-Cyrl.twol
Alphabet

 A:А Ә B:Б V:В G:Г Ғ D:Д E:Е Ё J:Ж Z:З İ:И Y:Й K:К Q:Қ L:Л M:М N:Н Ң O:О Ө P:П R:Р S:С T:Т U:У W:Ў Ү F:Ф X:Х H:Ҳ Ц Ч Ш Щ Ь I:Ы Ъ Э Ю Я
 a:а ә b:б v:в g:г ғ d:д e:е ё j:ж z:з i:и y:й k:к q:қ l:л m:м n:н ң o:о ө p:п r:р s:с t:т u:у w:ў ү f:ф x:х h:ҳ ц ч ш щ ь ı:ы ъ э ю я

 %':%'

;

Sets

DottedLetters = ә ө ү ғ   ! a o u g
                Ә Ө Ү Ғ ; ! A O U G

hLetters = ш ч   ! s c
           Ш Ч ; ! S C

Rules

"Dotted Letters"
Lx:Ly <=> _ %' ;
      where Lx in ( a o u g A O U G ) 
            Ly in ( ә ө ү ғ Ә Ө Ү Ғ )
      matched ;

"Get rid of apostrophe after apostrophe letters"
%':0 <=> :DottedLetters _ ;

"H letters"
Lx:Ly <=> _ h ;
      where Lx in ( s c S C )
            Ly in ( ш ч Ш Ч )
      matched ;

"Get rid of h after h letters"
h:0 <=> :hLetters _ ;

"Ng"
n:ң <=> _ g ;

"Get rid of g after ң"
g:0 <=> ң:n _ ;
    except
        _ %' ;
